Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2504
Corporate name; registration; assignment; procedure.

Any corporate name and its registration shall be assignable by instruments in writing duly executed. The instruments shall include the street address, city, and state of the assignee and shall be recorded with the Secretary of State, in duplicate, upon the payment of a fee of five dollars payable to the Secretary of State who, upon recording the assignment, shall return the duplicate copy, stamped with the date of filing, to the applicant or the representative submitting the assignment for filing.

Laws 1986, LB 1025, § 4.